Hawaii statutes.
§431P-3 Board of directors.
(a) The board of directors of the fund shall consist of the insurance
commissioner as an ex officio voting member and six members appointed by the
governor in accordance with section 26-34. The board shall be the policy making
body of the fund. As such, the board shall be responsible for establishing
policies for the administration and operation of the fund and the performance
of other duties and functions assigned to the fund.

(b) Two members shall, by and with the advice
and consent of the senate, be appointed by the governor for a term of four
years; provided that of the initial appointees, one shall be appointed for a
two-year term. A vacancy on the authority of a seat subject to this subsection
shall be filled in accordance with Article V, section 6, of the Constitution of
the State of Hawaii.

(c) Two members shall, by and with the advice
and consent of the senate, be appointed by the governor from a list of
nominations submitted by the president of the senate. The members appointed
from a list of nominations of the president of the senate shall serve for a
term of four years; provided that of the initial appointees, one shall be
appointed for a two-year term.

(d) Two members shall, by and with the advice
and consent of the senate, be appointed by the governor from a list of
nominations submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives. The
members appointed from a list of nominations of the speaker of the house of
representatives shall serve for a term of four years; provided that of the
initial appointees, one shall be appointed for a two-year term.

(e) The governor shall select a chairperson
and vice-chairperson from among the members.

(f) The board shall meet as often as necessary
to formulate and implement strategies and plans of operation in furtherance of
this chapter. Upon its appointment, the board shall adopt an interim plan of
operation within ninety days.

(g) The appointed directors shall receive no
compensation for services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement of necessary
expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their
duties.

(h) The board may appoint, not subject to
chapter 76, an executive director of the fund whose salary shall be set by the
board. The board may employ, not subject to chapter 76, technical experts and
officers, agents, and employees, permanent or temporary, as required. The
board may also contract with persons, not subject to chapters 76 and 78 when in
the determination of the board, the services to be performed are unique and
essential to the execution of the functions of the fund. [L 1993, c 339, pt of
§2; am L 1998, c 106, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2005, c 22, §29]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next